Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0318.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 67a. (1) A prisoner who receives nonemergency medical, dental, or optometric services at his or her request is responsible for a copayment fee to the department for those services, as determined by the department. If the prisoner is a minor, the prisoner's parent or guardian is also responsible for a copayment fee imposed under this section. (1) (2) A prisoner who intentionally injures himself or herself, and receives emergency medical care for that injury, is responsible for the entire cost of the medical care. , rather than the copayment described in subsection (1). (2) (3) The department shall determine whether those prisoners who injure themselves intentionally shall will be housed in a facility designed to allow on-site medical treatment of those injuries. Not later than 6 months after the effective date of this section, September 30, 1997, the director of the department shall report to the legislature on the feasibility and cost of implementing this subsection.